Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.060

Apprentices.

(1) A person wishing to work as an apprentice ocularist shall submit to the secretary the registration fee and completed application form signed by the applicant and the licensed ocularist who shall be responsible for the acts of the apprentice in the performance of his or her work in the apprenticeship program.

(2) Apprentices shall complete their ten thousand hours of apprenticeship within eight years and shall not work longer as an apprentice unless the secretary determines, after a hearing, that the apprentice was prevented by causes beyond his or her control from completing the apprenticeship and becoming a licensee hereunder in eight years.

(3) No licensee under this chapter may have more than two apprentices in training at one time.

[ 1991 c 180 s 7; 1991 c 3 s 146; 1980 c 101 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1991 c 3 s 146 and by 1991 c 180 s 7, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).